Hawaii statutes.
[§194-1 Definitions.] As used in this
[chapter], unless the context requires otherwise:

"Council" means the [invasive species
council].

"Department" means any entity that is
a member of the [invasive species council] established under section [194-2(a)].
[L 2003, c 85, §2; am L 2004, c 10, §16; am L 2006, c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next